Louisiana, session 2026, SB465.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1155(C), 1832(A) and (D), 1833(B) and (E), 1834, 1838(F) and
(G), 1853(A), the introductory paragraph of 1853(B)(1), and 1853(C) and (D), 1854(A), the
introductory paragraph of 1854(B), and 1854(C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
22:1839 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1155. Denial of claims; appeal; prior authorization; preexisting conditions
* * *
C. Any recoupment by a dental service contractor shall be in accordance with
R.S. 22:1838. A dental service contractor shall not retroactively deny, adjust, or
seek recoupment or refund of a paid claim for dental services submitted by a
dental provider for dental services rendered in good faith and pursuant to the
benefit plan for any reason after the expiration of eighteen months from the
date the initial claim was paid. The contractor shall not recoup a claim solely due
to a patient's loss of coverage or ineligibility if, at the time of treatment, the
contractor erroneously confirms coverage and eligibility, but had sufficient
information available to it indicating that the patient was no longer covered or was
ineligible for coverage.
Page 1 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 465 ENROLLED
* * *
§1832. Standards for receipt and processing of nonelectronic claims
A.(1) Any nonelectronic claim by a health care healthcare provider under
a contract with a health insurance issuer, for provision of health care healthcare
services, submitted by the provider or its agent within forty-five days of the date of
service, or date of discharge from a health care facility or institution, the period of
time set forth by the health insurance issuer for the timely filing of claims or
resubmitted because the original claim was not an accepted claim or not a clean
claim shall be paid, denied, or pended not more than forty-five thirty calendar days
from the date upon which a nonelectronic clean claim is received by the issuer or its
agent, unless it is not payable under the terms of the applicable contract of health
insurance coverage or unless just and reasonable grounds exist such as would put a
reasonable and prudent businessman on his guard.
(2) Any nonelectronic claim by a health care healthcare provider under a
contract with a health insurance issuer, for provision of health care healthcare
services that have prior authorization by the health insurance issuer, submitted
by the provider or its agent more than forty-five days after the date of service, or date
of discharge from a health care facility or institution, or resubmitted because the
original claim was not an accepted claim or not a clean claim within the period of
time set forth by the health insurance issuer for the timely filing of claims shall
be paid, denied, or pended not more than sixty ten calendar days from the date upon
which a nonelectronic clean claim is received by the issuer or its agent, unless it is
not payable under the terms of the applicable contract of insurance or unless just and
reasonable grounds exist such as would put a reasonable and prudent businessman
on his guard.
(3) Any other nonelectronic claim for health insurance coverage benefits
submitted for payment by an enrollee or insured or by a noncontracted health care
healthcare provider rendering covered health care healthcare services, or by the
provider's agent, shall be paid, denied, or pended not more than forty-five days from
the date upon which a nonelectronic clean claim is received by the issuer or its agent,
Page 2 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 465 ENROLLED
unless it is not payable under the terms of the applicable contract of insurance or
unless just and reasonable grounds exist such as would put a reasonable and prudent
businessman on his guard.
(4) For purposes of this Subsection, the issuer shall either provide written
notice to the provider within two business days that a claim is pended or allow the
provider Internet internet access to such information.
(5) Just and reasonable grounds, as used in this Subsection, shall include but
not be limited to determination of whether the enrollee or insured was eligible for
health insurance coverage on the date health care services were rendered.
* * *
D. The provisions of this Subpart shall not apply to the Office of Group
Benefits.
§1833. Standards for receipt and processing of electronic claims
* * *
B.(1) Any electronic claim for healthcare services that have prior
authorization by the health insurance issuer shall be paid, denied, or pended not
more than twenty-five ten days from the date upon which an electronic clean claim
is electronically received by the health insurance issuer or its agent, unless it is not
payable under the terms of the applicable contract of insurance or unless just and
reasonable grounds exist such as would put a reasonable and prudent businessman
on his guard. Any electronic claim for healthcare services that do not have prior
authorization by the health insurance issuer shall be paid, denied, or pended not
more than twenty-five days from the date upon which an electronic clean claim
is electronically received by the health insurance issuer or its agent, unless it is
not payable under the terms of the applicable contract of insurance.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, the issuer shall either provide written
notice to the provider within two business days that a claim is pended or allow the
provider Internet internet access to such information.
(3) Just and reasonable grounds, as used in this Subsection, shall include but
not be limited to determination of whether the enrollee or insured was eligible for
Page 3 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 465 ENROLLED
health insurance coverage on the date health care services were rendered.
* * *
E. The provisions of this Subpart shall not apply to the Office of Group
Benefits.
§1834. Remittance advice; thirty-day payment standard; limitations on claim filing
and audits
A. Each remittance advice generated by a health insurance issuer or its agent
to a health care healthcare provider or its agent shall include the following
information, if known at that time, clearly identified for each claim listed:
(1) The name of the enrollee or insured.
(2) Unique enrollee or insured identification number.
(3) Patient claim number or patient account number.
(4) Date of service.
(5) Total provider charges.
(6) Health insurance issuer contractual discount amount.
(7) Enrollee or insured liability, specifying any coinsurance, deductible,
copayment, or noncovered amount.
(8) Amount paid by health insurance issuer.
(9) Amount adjusted by health insurance issuer and the reason for adjustment.
(10) Amount denied and the reason for denial.
B. A health insurance issuer may elect to utilize a thirty-day payment
standard for compliance with R.S. 22:1832 and 1833 by providing written notice to
the commissioner. Such notice shall be in a form prescribed by the commissioner and
shall remain in effect until withdrawn in writing as may be required by the
commissioner. Any health insurance issuer electing to utilize a thirty-day payment
standard shall continue to comply with all other requirements of this Subpart.
C.B. A health insurance issuer that prescribes the period of time that a health
care healthcare provider under contract for provision of health care healthcare
services has to submit a claim for payment under R.S. 22:1832 or 1833 shall have
the same prescribed period of time following payment of such claim to perform any
Page 4 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 465 ENROLLED
review or audit for purposes of reconsidering the validity of such claim.
D.C. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no health
insurance insurer shall limit the right of a rural hospital to receive payment for
covered health care healthcare services as long as a claim for payment of such
services is submitted within one year after the date on which the rural hospital
provided the services.
E.D. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for health
services rendered in good faith and pursuant to the benefit plan, no health insurance
issuer shall retroactively deny payment or recoup any monies paid beyond ninety
days from the expiration of the allowable thirty-day period for the payment of any
claim when the denial or recoupment is based on a determination that the insured
was no longer covered under the plan at the time of the service.
F.E. The provision described in Subsection E Subsection D of this Section
shall not apply to the Office of Group Benefits or and to the claims of Office of
Group Benefits enrollees administered by health insurance issuers.
G.F. In order to be eligible for credit of premium by a health insurance issuer,
an employer that contracts with a health insurance issuer for the issuer's provision
or administration of health benefits shall provide notice to the health insurance issuer
that an employee, dependent, or retiree is no longer eligible for coverage in the group
benefit plan within ninety days of such ineligibility.
* * *
§1838. Recoupment of health insurance claims payments
* * *
F.(1) A health insurance issuer shall not retroactively deny, adjust, or seek
recoupment or refund of a paid claim for healthcare expenses submitted by a
healthcare provider for healthcare services rendered in good faith and pursuant to the
benefit plan for any reason after the expiration of eighteen twelve months from the
date the initial claim was paid.
(2) This Subsection shall not be construed to supersede any provision of law
that prescribes a time period less than eighteen twelve months for the retroactive
Page 5 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 465 ENROLLED
denial of payment or recoupment of monies paid for a claim or the reconsideration
of the validity of a claim.
G. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to the Office of Group
Benefits.
§1839. Waiver prohibited
The provisions of this Subpart shall not be waived by contract. Any
attempted waiver shall be void.
* * *
§1853. Nonelectronic claims submission and prompt processing standards
A.(1) Any nonelectronic claim for payment for prescription drugs, other
products and supplies, and pharmacist services submitted by a pharmacist or
pharmacy to a health insurance issuer or pharmacy benefit manager within forty-
five days of the date of service under a contract for provision of covered benefits
with a health insurance issuer shall be paid not more than forty-five twenty-one days
from the date upon which a correctly completed uniform claim form is furnished,
unless just and reasonable grounds exist such as would put a reasonable and prudent
businessman on his guard.
(2) Any nonelectronic claim for payment for prescription drugs, other
products and supplies, and pharmacist services submitted by a pharmacist or
pharmacy under a contract for provision of covered benefits with a health insurance
issuer more than forty-five days after the date of service or resubmitted because the
original claim was incomplete shall be paid not more than sixty thirty days from the
date upon which a correctly completed uniform claim form is furnished, unless just
and reasonable grounds exist such as would put a reasonable and prudent
businessman on his guard.
(3) Any other nonelectronic claim for payment for prescription drugs, other
products and supplies, and pharmacist services, whether submitted for payment by
an insured or enrollee or submitted by a pharmacist or pharmacy rendering covered
services that are not otherwise payable to the pharmacist or pharmacy under contract
with the health insurance issuer, shall be paid not more than thirty days from the date
Page 6 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 465 ENROLLED
upon which a correctly completed uniform claim form is furnished to the health
insurance issuer, unless just and reasonable grounds exist such as would put a
reasonable and prudent businessman on his guard.
B.(1) Health insurance issuers and pharmacy benefit managers shall have
appropriate handling procedures approved by the department for the acceptance of
nonelectronic claim submissions. Such procedures shall include:
* * *
C. Health insurance issuers and pharmacy benefit managers shall establish
appropriate procedures approved by the department to assure that any claimant who
is not paid within the time frames specified in this Section receives a late payment
adjustment equal to one percent of the amount due. For any period greater than
twenty-five days following the time frames specified in this Section, the health
insurance issuer shall pay an additional late payment adjustment equal to one percent
of the unpaid balance due for each month or partial month that such claim remains
unpaid.
D. Health insurance issuers and pharmacy benefit managers shall have
appropriate procedures approved by the department to assure compliance with this
Subpart. Such procedures shall include but shall not be limited to a plan for the
acceptance of nonelectronic claim submissions to document the actual date of receipt
and to prevent the loss of such claims.
§1854. Electronic claim submission standards
A. Any claim for payment for covered prescription drugs, other products and
supplies, and pharmacist services submitted by a pharmacist or pharmacy to a health
insurance issuer or pharmacy benefit manager as an electronic claim that is
electronically adjudicated shall be paid not later than the fifteenth day after the date
on which the claim was electronically adjudicated. If the governor declares a state
of emergency pursuant to R.S. 29:724, the time period prescribed in this Subsection
shall be interrupted during the continuance of the state of emergency for any claims
office which is located in the territorial limits of the declared state of emergency.
B. Health insurance issuers and pharmacy benefit managers shall have
Page 7 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 465 ENROLLED
appropriate handling procedures approved by the department for the acceptance of
electronic claim submissions. Such procedures shall include:
* * *
C. Health insurance issuers and pharmacy benefit managers shall establish
appropriate procedures approved by the department to assure that any claimant who
is not paid within the time frame specified in this Section receives a late payment
adjustment equal to one percent of the amount due. For any period greater than
twenty-five days following the time frames specified in this Section, the health
insurance issuer shall pay an additional late payment adjustment equal to one percent
of the unpaid balance due for each month or partial month that such claim remains
unpaid.
Section 2. R.S. 33:5151(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5151. Power to contract for group insurance; premiums
A.(1) Any municipality or political subdivision of the state may make
contracts of insurance with any insurance company legally authorized to do business
in this state insuring their employees and officials under policies of group insurance
covering hospitalization, and retirement, for such employees and officials, and may
agree to match the payments of the employees and officials for the premiums or
charges for any such contracts payable out of the funds of such municipality or
political subdivision, respectively.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection,
any municipality or political subdivision of this state with less than two
employees or officials may do either of the following:
(a) Make contracts of insurance with any insurance company legally
authorized to do business in this state insuring their employee or official under
policies of individual insurance covering hospitalization, and retirement, for the
employee or official, and may agree to match the payments of the employee and
official for the premiums or charges for any such contracts payable out of the
funds of the municipality or political subdivision, respectively.
(b) Reimburse the employee or official for payment toward any policies
Page 8 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 465 ENROLLED
of individual insurance covering hospitalization, and retirement, for the
employee or official.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 9 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.